Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW to read as follows:(1) The attorney general shall designate investigator positions that are limited authority Washington peace officers as defined in RCW 10.93.020.(2) An investigator designated as a limited authority Washington peace officer under this section may investigate economic and financial crimes.(3) The authority of an investigator in this section does not include the power to detain or arrest, and an investigator shall not be armed.(4) The authority of an investigator in this section to serve search warrants is limited to electronic service on a business after the search warrant is approved by a judicial officer. An investigator shall not physically serve a search warrant for business records.(5) An investigator who is a limited authority Washington peace officer under this section is subject to all applicable requirements in chapter 43.101 RCW, including but not limited to training and criminal background checks.(6) The attorney general shall not employ any person as a limited authority Washington peace officer investigator if that person's history or conduct meets the standards requiring denial, suspension, or revocation of an officer's certification under RCW 43.101.105.(7) The investigative authority or criminal jurisdiction of any other law enforcement agency is not modified by this section.(8) For the purposes of this section, "investigator" means an employee of the office of the attorney general whose job responsibilities include investigation of a suspected economic or financial crime. "Investigator" does not include office of the attorney general personnel identified in RCW 74.67.010.--- END ---